02_Morphology/chv/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ b
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ
  %{A%}:а %{A%}:е  %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
  %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
  %>:0
  %{ъ%}
;

Sets

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ;

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                    %{м%}: %>:  _н ;
                                    BackVow: %>: _ ;

"Non surface {Ă} in plural genitive"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>: _ н ;

"The exercise to the reader"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ;

"A to 0 after stem vowel"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> BackVow: %>: _ ;

"x is constrained to be y before a and after b"
x:y <=>    _ :a ;
        :b _ ;

        "{A} must correspond to the vowel before it"
        %{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx _ ;
              where Vx in ( a e o )
                    Vy in ( a e o )
              matched ;

"Vowels raise after a null-realised {x}"
Vx:Vy <=> %{x%}:0 _ ;
      where Vx in ( a e o )
            Vy in ( ə i u )
      matched ;
